Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,127
Jail Standards Board; develop and implement standards for criminal detention facilities.

On or before July 1, 1979, the Jail Standards Board shall study, develop, and implement minimum standards for the construction, maintenance, and operation of criminal detention facilities pursuant to sections 83-4,128 to 83-4,130.

Laws 1978, LB 212, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 83-948.01.